District of Columbia statutes.
48-1204

Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Department of Behavioral Health in accordance with subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of revenue from the payment of fines collected pursuant to § 48-1203.

(c)

The Fund shall be used for substance abuse prevention and treatment efforts.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

July 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-126, § 104, 61 DCR 3482